California statutes. Financial Code
 time are insufficient to pay in full the amounts provided by Section 18523, the amount paid to each thriftholder shall be ratably reduced in proportion to the amount by which the fund is deficient, and thereafter further payments shall be made ratably to such thriftholders in accordance with the directions of the commissioner as additional funds are paid into the fund from assessments or otherwise. If the thrift obligations are paid, each member’s account and special member’s account shall be reduced ratably based on the account balance for the total amount paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 13.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18491.

(a) When the property and business of a member, other than a special member, is being liquidated, the commissioner may direct Guaranty Corporation to pay each thrift obligation of the member specified in Section 18523 up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Guaranty Corporation shall pay the thrift obligations at the direction of, and in the amounts directed by, the commissioner within 10 days from the date the commissioner makes demand for payment under this section. If the total funds available from Guaranty Corporation at that time are insufficient to pay in full the amounts provided by Section 18523,
 the amount paid to each thriftholder shall be ratably reduced in proportion to the amount by which the fund is deficient, and thereafter further payments shall be made ratably to those thriftholders in accordance with the directions of the commissioner as additional funds become available to Guaranty Corporation.

(b) When any thrift obligation is paid up to the guaranteed amount as provided in subdivision (a), Guaranty Corporation shall be assigned all rights, title, and interest to each individual thrift obligation up to the amount paid by Guaranty Corporation to each individual thriftholder.

(c) Guaranty Corporation shall first receive ratable liquidation proceeds up to the amount paid by Guaranty Corporation to a thriftholder prior to any payment of liquidation proceeds to a thriftholder whose account was in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(d) Each member’s account and each special member’s account shall be reduced ratably based on the account balance for the total amount paid pursuant to subdivision (a). Liquidation proceeds paid to Guaranty Corporation pursuant to subdivision (c) shall ratably increase each member and special member account based on the account balance for the total amount paid pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 14.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18493.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that Guaranty Corporation has:

(a) Violated its articles of incorporation or any law of this state;

(b) Not paid amounts as directed by the commissioner pursuant to Section 18490;

(c) Invested its funds in violation of Section 18497;

(d) Not levied assessments as required by Sections 18535 and 18536;

(e) Has not
 brought and diligently prosecuted an action to enforce payment as required by Section 18538;

(f) Violated any section of this chapter; or

(g) Neglected or refused to submit its books, papers, and affairs to the inspection of any examiner; 
the commissioner may forthwith take possession of the property and business of Guaranty Corporation and retain possession until Guaranty Corporation satisfies the commissioner that it will operate in conformity with this chapter. During the time the commissioner has such possession he shall perform the duties and carry out the obligations of Guaranty Corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18494.

Whenever the commissioner has taken possession of the property and business of Guaranty Corporation, Guaranty Corporation within 10 days after such taking, if it deems itself aggrieved thereby, may apply to the superior court in the county in which the head office of Guaranty Corporation is located to enjoin further proceedings. The court, after citing the commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined, and after a hearing and a determination of the facts upon the merits, may dismiss such application or enjoin the commissioner from further proceedings and direct him to surrender the property and business to Guaranty Corporation, or make such
 further order as may be just.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18495.

An appeal may be taken from the judgment of the court by the commissioner or by Guaranty Corporation in the manner provided by law for appeals from the judgment of a superior court to the court of appeal. An appeal from the judgment of the court does not operate as a stay of the judgment unless the court, on good cause, so orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 150.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18496.

(a) Guaranty Corporation shall have independent authority to approve membership, or suspend or revoke the right to participate in Guaranty Corporation by any member for cause and to submit reports and make recommendations to the commissioner regarding the financial condition of any member and shall also do so if requested by the commissioner. These reports and recommendations shall not be public documents. There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, Guaranty Corporation or its members, directors, officers, employees or agents, or the commissioner
 or his or her authorized representatives, for any statements made by them in any reports or recommendations made hereunder.

(b) In order to permit Guaranty Corporation to fulfill its obligations under subdivision (a), upon the written request of Guaranty Corporation the commissioner may furnish to Guaranty Corporation a copy of financial statements or reports filed by a member or an industrial loan company making application to participate in Guaranty Corporation and a copy of the commissioner’s analysis of an industrial loan company’s receivables. Except for reports filed under Sections 18407 and 18410, such statements and reports shall not be public documents, and the information contained therein shall be privileged, and confidential to Guaranty Corporation for its sole use in carrying out its statutory functions. There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against the State of California, the
 commissioner or members of the commissioner’s staff or the commissioner’s authorized representatives, for the release of any information furnished to Guaranty Corporation pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) By written consent of a majority of its directors, Guaranty Corporation, in order to fulfill its obligations under subdivision (a), may appoint an independent certified public accountant or public accountant to prepare an audit report containing audited financial statements, together with such other information as Guaranty Corporation, in good faith, requires regarding the financial condition of any member. For the purposes of examination and investigation the certified public accountant or public accountant appointed by Guaranty Corporation shall have free access to the offices and places of business, books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes and vaults of the member.

(d) By written consent of a majority of its directors, Guaranty Corporation, in order to fulfill its obligations under subdivision (a), may hire or appoint specialized committees or employees to investigate the operations of a member company. Guaranty Corporation may have its specialized employees or committees investigate the affairs and examine the books, accounts, records and files used in the business of the member. For the purposes of examination and investigation the specialized employees and committees of Guaranty Corporation shall have free access to the offices and places of business, books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, and vaults of the member.

(e) Costs and expenses for such audit report or special investigation report shall be paid by Guaranty Corporation.

(f) Any person who uses any information obtained under subdivision (b), (c) or (d) for
 any purpose not authorized by subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(g) The powers granted to the Guaranty Corporation by this section may not be exercised in connection with special members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 16.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18496.1.

(a) A director, officer, employee, or agent of Thrift Guaranty Corporation shall be subject to liability for acts of fraud, willful misconduct, or reckless or criminal acts arising out of, or in connection with, the performance of his or her duties on behalf of Thrift Guaranty Corporation, but shall not be subject to liability or causes of action for acts other than those set forth in this section.

(b) The board of directors shall exercise reasonable efforts to obtain directors, officers, employees, and agents, errors and omissions liability
 insurance coverage and shall within 30 days from the end of each fiscal year submit to the commissioner its reports, advising the commissioner of the terms and costs of such coverage, if available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1349, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18497.

Guaranty Corporation may invest its funds only in readily marketable securities as provided by rules of the commissioner.

Upon request of the commissioner, Guaranty Corporation shall furnish an authorization for disclosure to the commissioner of financial records of such funds pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 17.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18498.

Income from investments shall be recorded in an income account and be used to defray expenses of administration. Income from investments that exceeds an amount determined by the board of directors to be adequate to provide for current expenses may be credited to members’ accounts. Each member’s account shall receive credit ratably based on the account balance, for the amount of the excess. Income received by Guaranty Corporation, whether or not credited to members’ accounts, shall be subject to a demand of the commissioner made pursuant to Section 18490 except as to that portion reserved by the board of directors for expenses of administration during the calendar
 year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18499.

Expenses of administration that exceed income from investments at year end shall be charged to members’ accounts. Each member’s account shall be charged ratably based on the account balance for the amount of the excess.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18500.

Guaranty Corporation shall have authority to:

(a) Borrow funds when necessary to effectuate the provisions of this chapter. 

(b) Make loans to, deposits in, purchase assets or securities of, assume liabilities of, or make contributions to any Guaranty Corporation member to minimize the deficiency payments that might be required under Article 2 (commencing with Section 18490).

(c) Organize a new thrift company to assume the thrift
 obligations and temporarily perform the functions of the closed company. The commissioner may waive any provision of the Industrial Loan Law necessary to enable Guaranty Corporation to organize a new thrift company.

(d) Act as a conservator or receiver of a member company that the commissioner has taken possession of.

(e) Guaranty Corporation may use the fund, or any portion of the fund, in exercising its authority.

(f) Employ consultants, advisors, and others to assist Guaranty Corporation in fulfilling its obligations and objectives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 18.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18501.

The commissioner shall give prompt notice to Guaranty Corporation when the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a member and shall give further prompt notice when the commissioner determines to liquidate the property and business of a member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18502.

Memberships issued by Guaranty Corporation shall be nontransferable and shall be exempt from the provisions of the Corporate Securities Law of 1968.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18503.

The commissioner and the commissioner’s duly designated representatives may at any time investigate the affairs and examine the books, accounts, records and files used by Guaranty Corporation. The commissioner and the commissioner’s duly designated representatives shall have free access to the offices, books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, and vaults of Guaranty Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 19.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18504.

Any member or industrial loan company making application to participate in Guaranty Corporation aggrieved by any action or decision of Guaranty Corporation may appeal to the commissioner within 30 days from the action or decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 20.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18505.

(a) After consultation with, and approval by, the Thrift Guaranty Corporation, the commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations regarding information to be given to holders of investment certificates of industrial loan companies including, but not limited to, information containing any reference to a guarantee or insurance program of investment certificates, and the time and conditions for payments to the holders of investment certificates, in the event an industrial loan company is taken over by the commissioner. These regulations shall include the means for informing investment certificate holders of
 their rights.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commissioner authorize information which can be clearly understood by a typical investment certificate holder. In addition, the information may in no way imply that the State of California stands behind or is involved with any type of guarantee or insurance program for industrial loan companies investment certificate holders.

(c) These rules and regulations shall be adopted on an emergency basis within 60 days of the effective date of this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 21.5.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18506.

No person shall advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast, in any manner any statement or representation with regard to its membership in Guaranty Corporation or that any of its thrift obligations are in any manner guaranteed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 583, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

18507.

In order to permit Guaranty Corporation to fulfill its obligations under this chapter, the commissioner shall furnish to Guaranty Corporation a list of all industrial loan companies that are not insured companies which have outstanding thrift obligations and one copy of the independent audit report on each such industrial loan company filed with him as of the preceding December 31 and not later than April 1 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1011, Sec. 5.   Effective September 23, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

18508.

An industrial loan company or its successor shall not be entitled to receive a refund, return, withdrawal, or distribution of the amount in its member’s account or of any assessments paid by it except upon liquidation of Guaranty Corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 583, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

18509.

(a) Guaranty Corporation may elect to wind up and dissolve upon approval of the commissioner, the board, and the members in accordance with Section 8610 of the Corporations Code, after (1) each industrial loan company has become a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or redeemed all of its outstanding thrift obligations or (2) Guaranty Corporation has satisfied its guarantee of thrift obligations as provided in this chapter.

(b) Upon liquidation, after complying with the provisions of Section 8713 of the Corporations Code and notwithstanding Section 8717
 of the Corporations Code, the assets of Guaranty Corporation shall be distributed to its members, past and present, including special members, ratably based on the balance of the members’ accounts, as established by resolution of the Board of Directors of Guaranty Corporation in accordance with the following:

(1) The account of each member, past and present, including special members, shall be credited with all assessments paid by the member to Guaranty Corporation.

(2) For each fiscal year, all current and prior expenses of administration of Guaranty Corporation shall be charged to the accounts of all members, past and present, including special members, ratably based on the balance of each account. 

(3) With respect to the account of each member to whom Guaranty Corporation has advanced funds or on whose behalf
 Guaranty Corporation has paid claims and expenses, the following adjustments shall be made:

(A) The member’s account shall be charged in the amount of the funds advanced or paid as of the date of advance or payment.

(B) If the amount advanced or paid exceeds the balance of the member’s account, then (i) the member’s account shall be deemed to have been closed, and the excess shall be allocated and charged ratably to the accounts of all other members, past and present, including special members, and (ii) if the member continued to operate after the date of the advance or payment, whether under new ownership or management or under the management of Guaranty Corporation, then a new member account shall, for purposes of this section, be deemed to have been established for the member with a zero balance, which shall be credited with subsequent assessments paid.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 583, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

18510.

The Board of Directors of Guaranty Corporation shall be composed of five members, at least two of which shall be public members. The five members shall be appointed by the commissioner. The commissioner shall consult with the President of Thrift Guaranty Corporation before making an appointment. Public members shall not be affiliated with any company or affiliate of any company or employed by any state agency. A public member shall not be a relative of any officer or director of any company or its affiliates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 614.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18511.

Guaranty Corporation shall establish a permanent office in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 25.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18512.

The commissioner may require Guaranty Corporation to obtain a bond, insurance, or reinsurance which provides additional protection against losses to its members’ thriftholders. The type, amount, and form of this protection is subject to the commissioner’s written approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 26.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Purpose and Scope of Guaranty Corporation [18520. - 18525.]

18520.

It shall be the purpose of Guaranty Corporation to guarantee full payment of guaranteed accounts of members, exclusive of special members, up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each account, subject to the express limitations provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 27.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18521.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 18521 or 18100.5, until July 1, 1990, each industrial loan company, other than a premium finance agency, which has issued and has outstanding thrift obligations shall, as a condition of its authority to continue to conduct business under this division, have its outstanding thrift obligations insured or guaranteed by Thrift Guaranty Corporation, or participate as a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; however, each industrial loan company shall, as a condition of its authority to continue to conduct business under this division, continue to participate as a member or a special member as
 defined in Section 18476, in Thrift Guaranty Corporation in accordance with this chapter and rules established by the Board of Directors of Thrift Guaranty Corporation until it has paid assessments required by Section 18537.

(b) On and after July 1, 1990, each industrial loan company, other than a premium finance agency, which has issued and has outstanding thrift obligations, shall, as a condition of its authority to continue to conduct business under this division, participate as a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. 

(c) Any person not transacting the business of an industrial loan company prior to the effective date of this section, who thereafter commences business under the provisions of this division, shall, upon commencement of its business, participate as a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(d) Thrift Guaranty Corporation shall have the power to seek insurance, guarantee, or surety, with an insurer or surety, or guarantor authorized to transact business in this state. The insurance shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner after consultation with the Insurance Commissioner. It is the intent of the Legislature to permit Thrift Guaranty Corporation to seek insurance and Thrift Guaranty Corporation’s insurer to seek reinsurance. Thrift Guaranty Corporation shall remain in existence after July 1, 1990, to assist in the winding up, liquidation, or merger of industrial loan companies unable to comply with the requirements of subdivision (b) by that date. Thrift Guaranty Corporation shall continue to guarantee outstanding thrift obligations sold and issued prior to July 1, 1990, by an industrial loan company which has not complied with the requirements of subdivision (b) by July 1, 1990, until all outstanding thrift obligations have
 been redeemed by the issuer, a successor to the issuer in compliance with the requirements of subdivision (b), or Thrift Guaranty Corporation. 

(e) In addition to any other provision of this section, if during that period of time ending July 1, 1990, the United States Congress or the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System adopt or amend a law or regulations which pertain to an industrial loan company applying for and obtaining membership in the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, and the new federal law or regulations prevent an industrial loan company from obtaining Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation coverage solely because the company’s holding company status prevents Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation membership, a successor to the Thrift Guaranty Corporation approved by the commissioner, or some other institutional mechanism approved by the commissioner, which obtains insurance in accordance with this subdivision, may
 continue to discharge its function so long as the insurance remains in effect.

(f) Within one year of the effective date of the act which adds this section, and annually thereafter until July 1, 1990, the commissioner shall report to the Legislature on the following:

(1) The progress of Thrift Guaranty Corporation in obtaining reinsurance.

(2) The progress of licensees in converting to coverage by an instrumentality of the United States government or by a private insurer, surety, or guarantor. 

(3) Recommendations for additional legislation if, in the commissioner’s opinion, additional legislation would be desirable to encourage industrial loan companies to seek coverage for investment certificates from sources other than Thrift Guaranty
 Corporation.

The commissioner shall submit special reports on these matters as may be required by the circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 787, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

18521.6.

No industrial loan company which fails to comply with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 18521.5 by June 30, 1990, may continue to sell and issue investment certificates beyond that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 787, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

18523.

The following described thrift obligations will be guaranteed by Guaranty Corporation in the amounts hereinafter set forth below:

(a) Single ownership investment certificates. Funds owned by an individual and invested in the manner set forth below shall be added together and guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate.

(1) Individual investment certificates (or investment certificates of the marital or domestic partnership community of which the individual is a member) and invested in one or more investment certificates in his or her own name shall be guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the
 aggregate.

(2) Funds owned by a principal and invested in one or more investment certificates in the name or names of agents or nominees shall be added to any individual investment certificates of the principal and guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate.

(3) Investment certificates held by guardians, custodians, or conservators for the benefit of their wards or for the benefit of a minor under a Uniform Gifts to Minors Act and invested in one or more investment certificates in the name of the guardian, custodian, or conservator shall be added to any individual investment certificates of the ward or minor and guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate.

(b) Testamentary investment certificates.

(1) Funds
 owned by an individual and invested in a revocable trust investment certificate, tentative trust investment certificate, payable-on-death investment certificate, or similar investment certificate evidencing an intention that on his or her death the funds shall belong to his or her spouse, child, or grandchild, shall be guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate, as to each such named beneficiary, separately from any other investment certificates of the owner.

(2) If the named beneficiary of such an investment certificate is other than the owner’s spouse, child, or grandchild, the funds in the investment certificate shall be added to any individual investment certificates of such owner and guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate, separately from the individual investment certificates of the beneficiaries of the estate or of the executor or administrator.

(c) Investment certificates held by executors or administrators. Funds of a decedent held in the name of the decedent or in the name of the executor or administrator of his or her estate and invested in one or more investment certificates shall be guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate, separately from the individual investment certificates of the beneficiaries of the estate or of the executor or administrator.

(d) Corporation or partnership investment certificates. Investment certificates of a corporation or partnership engaged in any independent activity shall be guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate. An investment certificate of a corporation or partnership not engaged in an independent activity shall be deemed to be owned by the person or persons owning such corporation or comprising such partnership and, for guarantee
 purposes, the interest of each person in the investment certificate shall be added to any other investment certificates individually owned by such person and guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate. The term “independent activity” means any activity other than one directed solely at increasing guarantee coverage under this chapter.

(e) Unincorporated associations. Investment certificates of an unincorporated association engaged in any independent activity shall be guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate. An investment certificate of an unincorporated association not engaged in an independent activity shall be deemed to be owned by the persons comprising such association and, for guarantee purposes, the interest of each owner in the investment certificate shall be added to any other investment certificates individually owned by such person and guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)
 in the aggregate.

(f) Joint investment certificates.

(1) Investment certificates owned jointly, whether as joint tenants with right of survivorship, as tenants by the entireties, as tenants in common, or by spouses as community property, shall be guaranteed separately from investment certificates individually owned by the coowners.

(2) A joint investment certificate shall be deemed to exist, for purposes of guarantee of investment certificates, only if each coowner has personally executed an investment certificate signature card and possesses redemption rights.

(3) An investment certificate owned jointly which does not qualify as a joint investment certificate for purposes of guarantee of investment certificates shall be treated as owned by the named
 persons as individuals and the actual ownership interest of each such person in such investment certificate shall be added to any other investment certificates individually owned by such person and guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate.

(4) All joint investment certificates owned by the same combination of individuals shall first be added together and guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate.

(5) The interest of each coowner in all joint investment certificates owned by different combinations of individuals shall then be added together and guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate.

(g) Trust investment certificates. All trust interests for the same beneficiary invested in investment certificates established pursuant to valid trust
 arrangements created by the same settlor (grantor) shall be added together and guaranteed up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate, separately from other investment certificates of the trustee of such trust funds or the settlor or beneficiary of such trust arrangements.

(h) Thrift obligations withdrawn by checks that have not cleared a member’s bank account at the time the commissioner has taken possession of the property and business of a member. The owner of the funds represented by such a check shall be recognized for all purposes of a claim for guaranteed thrift obligations to the same extent as if his or her name and interest were disclosed on the records of the member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 39.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18525.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, Guaranty Corporation, with the written consent of the commissioner, shall have the power to assume obligations, enter into contracts, including contracts of guarantee or suretyship, incur liabilities, borrow money, lend money or otherwise use its credit, and secure any of its obligations, contracts, or liabilities by mortgage, pledge, security interest, or other encumbrances of all or any part of its property and assets, including, but not limited to, income from assessments of members or rights thereto, and income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 34.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Assessments [18535. - 18538.]

18535.

Guaranty Corporation shall establish and maintain a guarantee fund as follows:

(a) Each new member, other than a new special member, shall pay one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to the guarantee fund to become a member.

(b) Whenever the commissioner finds that the controlling interest or 50 percent or more of the stock of a member which paid less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to become a member has been transferred, the member shall pay to the fund whatever sums are necessary
 to bring the member’s total contribution pursuant to subdivision (a) to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or 1 percent of the member’s total outstanding thrift obligations on the date of transfer, whichever is less.

As used in this subdivision “controlling interest” means any percentage of stock which allows the stockholder to have control of management of the member company.

The provisions of this subdivision shall not be applicable (1) if the transfer of stock is between affiliated companies of a holding company and the holding company is exempt from the qualification requirement of Section 25130 of the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 by subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 25101 of the Corporations Code, or (2) if the actual or contemplated change of ownership is to the transferor’s ancestors, descendants, or spouse, or any custodian or trustee for the account of the transferor or the transferor’s ancestors,
 descendants, or spouse, or to a transferee by a trustee or custodian for the account of the transferee or the transferee’s ancestors, descendants, or spouse.

This subdivision shall apply, commencing January 1, 1987, to any member in existence prior to January 1, 1982. All other members shall be subject to this subdivision on and after January 1, 1982.

(c) If the total amount in the fund (less any then unpaid demand made by the commissioner pursuant to Section 18492) on March 15 of any year is less than 112 percent of the total outstanding thrift obligations of all members, other than special members, as shown on the most recent independent audit reports required by Section 18405, then on or before May 1 of that year Guaranty Corporation shall levy an assessment. Each member, other than a special member,
 shall be assessed an amount equal to fifteen-hundredths of 1 percent of its outstanding thrift obligations as shown on its most recent independent audit report required by Section 18405. Guaranty Corporation may levy this assessment quarterly, based on members’ quarterly reports, at one quarter of the annual assessment rate authorized by this subdivision.

(d) If the total amount in the fund (less any then unpaid demand made by the commissioner pursuant to Section 18492) on March 15 of any year hereafter is equal to or in excess of 112 percent of the total outstanding thrift obligations of all members, other than special members, as shown on the most recent independent audit reports required by Section 18405, then on or before May 1 of that year Guaranty Corporation shall levy an assessment on each member, other than a special member, that has
 not fulfilled both the following conditions as of March 15 of that year:

(1) Paid total cumulative assessment payments to Guaranty Corporation exceeding in the aggregate 112 percent of the total outstanding thrift obligations of that member shown on its most recent independent audit report required by Section 18405;

(2) Has a member’s account balance in Guaranty Corporation exceeding 112 percent of the total outstanding thrift obligations of that member shown on its most recent independent audit report required by Section 18405.

Each member who has failed to fulfill both the preceding conditions as of March 15 of that year shall be assessed
 an amount equal to fifteen-hundredths of 1 percent of its outstanding thrift obligations as shown on its most recent independent audit report required by Section 18405.

(e) If two members merge prior to May 1 of any year, the surviving member shall be liable for the assessment of the disappearing member that would have been payable to Guaranty Corporation pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) had the merger not occurred prior to May 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 34.5.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18536.

Guaranty Corporation shall send a written notice of assessment to each member assessed within 10 days after the levy of any assessment. Amounts assessed shall be paid to Guaranty Corporation by each member assessed not later than 90 days following written notice of assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18538.

In the event any member fails to pay an assessment when due, Guaranty Corporation shall report such default in writing to the commissioner and the defaulting member within 24 hours of such default and thereafter the rights and benefits of membership of such defaulting member in Guaranty Corporation shall be suspended and the defaulting member shall not be authorized to sell or issue its investment certificates in any form until all delinquent assessments are paid in full; provided, however, that the thrift obligations of the defaulting member shall continue to be protected as provided in this chapter. Within 30 days after default, Guaranty Corporation
 shall bring an action in law or in equity to enforce payment. If Guaranty Corporation does not bring such action within the time specified, the commissioner may bring an action in law or in equity to enforce such payment. Upon payment of all sums due, the member shall be reinstated and thereafter may sell and issue its investment certificates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 87, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Insurance Premium Financing [18560. - 18643.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [18560. - 18567.]

18560.

“Premium finance agency” means any industrial loan company incorporated under this division which, by the terms of its authority to engage in the industrial loan business, is permitted to issue or sell investment certificates subject to the limitations set forth in Section 18596 and its business is limited to that set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1296.)
-------------------------------------------

18561.

Such terms relating to insurance as are used in this chapter shall have the meaning ascribed to them in the Insurance Code and in the practices of the insurance business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18562.

As used in this chapter, “insured” means the person who has purchased or arranged to purchase an insurance contract and who enters into a premium finance agreement with a premium finance agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18563.
